New York, session 2025-2026, A39.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Pursuant to section 1643 of the vehicle and traffic law, 2 the village of Canton in the town of Canton in St. Lawrence County is 3 hereby authorized and empowered to lower the speed limit to 40 miles per 4 hour on East Main Street between mile marker 11 7506 1320 and mile mark- 5 er 11 7506 1332, in the village of Canton provided the governing body of 6 such village shall establish such speed limit by local law, ordinance, 7 order, rule or regulation. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00096-01-5